Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2307.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) Authorization and oversight of prenatally and
postnatally diagnosed conditions awareness programs are hereby
transferred from the department of health and environment to the
Kansas council on developmental disabilities. The powers, duties and
functions of the department of health and environment related to
prenatally and postnatally diagnosed conditions awareness programs as
provided in K.S.A. 65-1,259, and amendments thereto, are hereby
transferred and imposed upon the Kansas council on developmental
disabilities.
(b) Whenever the department of health and environment, the
secretary of health and environment, or words of like effect, are
referred to or designated by statute, contract or other document, and
such reference or designation is in regard to any function, power or
duty related to prenatally and postnatally diagnosed conditions
awareness programs as provided in K.S.A. 65-1,259, and amendments
thereto, such reference or designation shall be deemed to apply to the
Kansas council on developmental disabilities.
(c) All rules and regulations, orders and directives of the secretary
of health and environment related to prenatally and postnatally
diagnosed conditions awareness programs that are in effect pursuant to
K.S.A. 65-1,259, and amendments thereto on the effective date of this
act shall continue to be effective and shall be deemed to be rules and
regulations, orders and directives of the chairperson of the Kansas
council on developmental disabilities until amended, revoked or
nullified pursuant to law.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 65-1,259 is hereby amended to read as follows: 65-
1,259. (a) The secretary of the department of health and environment
may Kansas council on developmental disabilities shall authorize and
oversee certain activities, including the awarding of grants, contracts or
cooperative agreements to eligible entities to:
(1) Collect, synthesize and disseminate current evidence-based
information relating to Down syndrome or other prenatally or
postnatally diagnosed conditions; and
(2) coordinate the provision of, and access to, new or existing
supportive services for women and the spouses of such women who
receive a positive diagnosis of Down syndrome or other prenatally or
postnatally diagnosed conditions for their child, including, but not
limited to:
(A) The establishment of a resource telephone hotline or website
accessible to women and the spouses of such women who receive a
positive diagnosis of Down syndrome or other prenatally or postnatally
diagnosed conditions for their child;
(B) the development of outreach programs to new and expecting
parents to provide them with up-to-date information on the range of
outcomes for individuals living with the diagnosed condition, including
physical, developmental, educational and psychosocial outcomes;
(C) the development of local peer support programs to effectively
serve women and the spouses of such women who receive a positive
diagnosis of Down syndrome or other prenatally or postnatally
diagnosed conditions for their child;
(D) the establishment of a network of local registries of families
willing to adopt newborns with Down syndrome or other prenatally or
postnatally diagnosed conditions, and links to adoption agencies willing

HOUSE BILL No. 2307—page 2
to place babies with Down syndrome or other prenatally or postnatally
diagnosed conditions with families willing to adopt; and
(E) the establishment of awareness and education programs for
health care providers who provide, interpret or inform parents of the
results of prenatal tests for Down syndrome or other prenatally or
postnatally diagnosed conditions to patients.
(b) A grantee under this section shall make the following available
to health care providers of parents who receive a prenatal or postnatal
diagnosis for their child:
(1) Up-to-date, evidence-based, written information concerning
the range of outcomes for individuals living with the diagnosed
condition, including physical, developmental, educational and
psychosocial outcomes; and
(2) contact information regarding support services, including
information hotlines and websites specific to Down syndrome or other
prenatally or postnatally diagnosed conditions, resource centers or
clearinghouses, local peer support groups and other education and
support programs.
(c) Information provided under this subsection shall be culturally
and linguistically appropriate as needed by women and the spouses of
such women who receive a positive diagnosis for Down syndrome or
other prenatally or postnatally diagnosed conditions for their child, and
approved by the secretary Kansas council on developmental
disabilities.
(d) In distributing funds under this section, the secretary Kansas
council on developmental disabilities shall place an emphasis on
funding partnerships between health care professional groups and
disability advocacy organizations.
(e) On or before January 12, 2015 11, 2027, the secretary Kansas
council on developmental disabilities shall prepare and submit a report
to the governor and the legislature on the grants, contracts and
cooperative agreements made under this section and the effectiveness
of the programs supported by such grants, contracts and cooperative
agreements.
(f) As used in this section:
(1) "Down syndrome" means a chromosomal disorder caused by
an error in cell division that results in the presence of an extra whole or
partial copy of chromosome 21.
(2) "Eligible entity" means the state, or any political subdivision
thereof, or any other entity with appropriate expertise in prenatally and
postnatally diagnosed conditions, as determined by the secretary
Kansas council on developmental disabilities.
(3) "Health care provider" shall have the same meaning means the
same as that term is defined in K.S.A. 40-3401, and amendments
thereto.
(4) "Postnatally diagnosed condition" means any health condition
identified during the 12-month period beginning at birth.
(5) "Prenatally diagnosed condition" means any fetal health
condition identified by prenatal genetic testing or prenatal screening
procedures.
(6) "Prenatal test" means diagnostic or screening tests offered to
pregnant women seeking routine prenatal care that are administered on
a required or recommended basis by a health care provider based on
medical history, family background, ethnic background, previous test
results or other risk factors.
(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health
and environment.
(g) (1) There is hereby established in the state treasury the
prenatally and postnatally diagnosed conditions awareness programs
fund. All moneys credited to the prenatally and postnatally diagnosed
conditions awareness programs fund shall be expended only for
prenatally and postnatally diagnosed conditions awareness programs.
All expenditures from the prenatally and postnatally diagnosed
conditions awareness programs fund shall be made in accordance with

HOUSE BILL No. 2307—page 3
appropriation acts upon warrants of the director of accounts and
reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the chairperson of the
Kansas council on developmental disabilities.
(2) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $25,000 from the state general fund to the the prenatally and
postnatally diagnosed conditions awareness programs fund.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 65-1,259 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and passed
that body
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
______________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
__________________________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.